Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must subsidize student fees related to exam registration and administration for students taking the following exams:(a) AP;(b) International baccalaureate; and(c) Cambridge international.(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and other recipients of state funds appropriated for the purposes of this section may not use the funds to supplant federal and private funds that subsidize the student fees related to exam registration and administration for the exams included under this section.Sec. 2. RCW 28A.600.280 and 2022 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The education data center established in RCW 43.41.400, in collaboration with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, the state board for community and technical colleges, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the student achievement council, and the public four-year institutions of higher education, shall prepare the dual credit report required by this section.(2) Annually, by September 1st, the education data center must submit the report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.(3) The report must include:(a) Data about student participation rates, award of high school credit, award of postsecondary credit at an institution of higher education, and academic performance for each dual credit program; and(b) Data on the total unduplicated head count and percentage of students enrolled, students who have been awarded high school credit, and students who have been awarded postsecondary credit at an institution of higher education, in at least one dual credit program course.(4) Data described in subsection (3) of this section must be disaggregated by dual credit program, by the student categories and subcategories described in RCW 28A.300.042 (1) and (3), and by:(a) Gender;(b) Students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW;(c) Students who are homeless as defined in RCW 43.330.702; and(d) Multilingual/English learners.(5)(a) The report must also recommend additional categories of data reporting and disaggregation. For each additional category, the report must describe:(i) The purpose for reporting on, or disaggregating by, the category;(ii) The specific metric or indicator to be used;(iii) Whether the specific metric or indicator is a new data point; and(iv) Which educational entities should be responsible for collecting the data.(b) ((The 2022 report must recommend whether to require: (i) Reporting of data related to the application of postsecondary credits earned through a dual credit program towards postsecondary credentials and degrees; and (ii) comparison of postsecondary credential and degree attainment between students who did or did not participate in a dual credit program, and between students who participated in different dual credit programs))The 2026 report must include an analysis of whether the policy in section 1 of this act resulted in a change in the exam passage rates and the demographics of students participating in advanced placement, international baccalaureate, and Cambridge international courses.(6) For the purposes of this section, "dual credit program" means running start under RCW 28A.600.300, college in the high school under RCW 28A.600.287, career and technical education dual credit, Cambridge international, international baccalaureate, advanced placement, and other programs in which a student qualifies for postsecondary and high school credit upon either successfully completing the course or passing an exam.--- END ---